Utah statutes.
63G-3-401.   Division of Administrative Rules created -- Appointment of director.

(1)  There is created within the Department of Administrative Services the Division of Administrative Rules, to be administered by a director.

(2)  The director of administrative rules shall be appointed by the executive director with the approval of the governor.

